Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
Lieutenant Governor

11.400.
Duties of Lieutenant Governor.

In addition to the duties prescribed for the office by the Constitution of the Commonwealth of Kentucky, the duties of the Lieutenant Governor shall be as follows:

To serve as vice chairman of the State Property and Buildings Commission as prescribed by KRS

56.450

;

To serve as vice chairman of the Kentucky Turnpike Authority as prescribed in KRS

175.430

;

To serve as a member of the Board of the Kentucky Housing Corporation in accordance with KRS

198A.030

; and

To serve as a member of Kentucky delegations on the following interstate compact commissions or boards:

The Breaks Interstate Park Commission as provided in KRS

148.225

;

The Falls of the Ohio Interstate Park Commission pursuant to KRS

148.242

;

The Tennessee-Tombigbee Waterway Development Authority pursuant to KRS

182.305

;

The Interstate Water Sanitation Control Commissions as prescribed by KRS

224.18-710

; and

The Kentucky Mining Advisory Council for the Interstate Mining Compact as provided by KRS

350.310

.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit the Governor and Lieutenant Governor from agreeing upon additional duties within the executive branch of the state government to be performed by the Lieutenant Governor.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 141, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 447, § 13, effective April 12, 1982; 1984, ch. 111, § 18, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 331, § 7, effective July 15, 1986; 1992, ch. 105, § 70, effective July 14, 1992; 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 74, effective September 16, 1993; 1994, ch. 486, § 14, effective July 15, 1994; 2003, ch. 82, § 1, effective June 24, 2003; 2007, ch. 47, § 4, effective June 26, 2007; 2017 ch. 80, § 1, effective June 29, 2017; 2021 ch. 12, § 1, effective March 12, 2021.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Since Chapter 4 of Acts 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), contained an emergency clause [§ 92] it became effective as a whole when the Governor tendered the bill, which he had signed, to the Secretary of State on February 18, 1993. However, section 87 (13) of Ch. 4 of Acts 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.) provided that, except as provided in §§ 88, 89, and 90, §§ 1-84 of the Act should become effective two hundred ten (210) days after the effective date of the Act, September 16, 1993; other subsections within § 87 establish a transition schedule with other specific dates calculated from the effective date of the Act. Such schedule is actually a listing of deadlines within which certain actions called for in § 87 of the Act are to be completed. Such schedule is as follows: “within 45 days of the effective date of the act” = on or before April 5, 1993; “within 60 days of the effective date of the act” = on or before April 19, 1993; “within 75 days of the effective date of the act” = on or before May 4, 1993; “within 90 days of the effective date of the act” = on or before May 19, 1993; “within 150 days of the effective date of the act” = on or before July 19, 1993; “within 180 days of the effective date of the act” = on or before August 17, 1993; “two hundred ten (210) days after the effective date of the act” = September 16, 1993.

OAG 93-25

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Compensation, Ky. Const., § 86.

Election, term, qualifications, Ky. Const., § 82.

Governor, when to act as, Ky. Const., § 84.